ko: 양묘기 디자인: 수평; 수직; 기타
en: Windlass design: Horizontal; Vertical; Other
pt-PT: Design de molinete: Horizontal; Vertical; Outro
zh-CN: 卷扬机设计: 水平; 垂直; 其他
hu: Csörlő kialakítása: Vízszintes; Függőleges; Egyéb
th: การออกแบบเครื่องกว้าน: แนวนอน; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
fi: Tuulilasien muotoilu: Vaakasuora; Pystysuora; Muu
ro-RO: Design vinci de ancoră: Orizontal; Vertical; Altele
hr-HR: Dizajn vitla: Horizontalno; Vertikalno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Dizajn navijaka: Horizontálny; Vertikálny; Iné
tr: Çıkrık tasarımı: Yatay; Dikey; Diğer
bg-BG: Дизайн на лебедка: Хоризонтална; Вертикална; Други
vi: Thiết kế kính chắn gió: Ngang; Dọc; Khác
pt-BR: Formato do molinete: Horizontal; Vertical; Outro
nb: Ankerspilldesign: Horisontal; Vertikal; Annet
el: Σχεδιασμός βαρούλκου: Οριζόντιο; Κάθετο; Άλλο
ja: ウィンドラスの種類: ホリゾンタル; バーティカル; その他
cs: Konstrukce navijáku: Horizontální; Vertikální; Jiné
nl: Ontwerp windas: Horizontaal; Verticaal; Andere
it: Design del verricello: Orizzontale; Verticale; Altro
da: Ankerspildesign: Vandret; Lodret; Andet
pl: Projekt windy kotwicznej: Pozioma; Pionowa; Inne
lt-LT: Gervės dizainas: Horizontalus; Vertikalus; Kita
sv: Ankarspelsutförande: Horisontell; Vertikal; Övrigt
fr: Conception du guindeau: Horizontal; Vertical; Autre
ru: Конструкция брашпиля: Горизонтальный; Вертикальный; Другой
zh-TW: 起錨機設計: 水平; 垂直; 其他
es: Diseño de molinete: Horizontal; Vertical; Otros
sl-SI: Zasnova vitla: Vodoravna; Navpična; Drugo
de: Design der Ankerwinde: Horizontal; Vertikal; Sonstiges